Massachusetts, session 194th, H3088.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The commissioner of the department of revenue shall appoint and conduct a study
group of experts and interested parties to do the following:
(1) For each fiscal year since the effective date of chapter 62F of the General Laws,
conduct a review and evaluation of the factors for the calculation of state tax revenues and the
allowable state tax growth factor as defined in section 1 of said chapter 62F. This review shall
include:
of 2

(i) The amount of state tax revenues from excises that originate from each city or town
retail sales and use, meals, alcoholic beverages, tobacco and any other tax or excise whose
source of revenue is economic activity in a municipality;
(ii) Any issues regarding the inclusion revenues from taxes and fees, that are designated
for a specific legislative or constitutional purpose or function, in the calculation of excess state
tax revenues as defined in said section 1. Among other designated revenues, these include
unemployment insurance assessments and motor vehicle fuels excises.
(iii) The amount and source of each tax, surtax, receipt, penalty and other monetary
exaction and interest as defined in the term “state tax revenue” in said section 1 deposited into
the General Fund of the commonwealth.
(iv) For each tax, surtax, receipt, penalty and other monetary exaction and interest as
defined in the term “state tax revenue” in said section 1 whose revenue is not deposited into the
General Fund identify the specific fund each is deposited into.
(v) An analysis of the effect on the formula and factors used in chapter 62F regarding
factors such as increased inflation, increases in state and federal unemployment benefits and
changes in federal tax causing overstatement of excess state tax revenues and state tax growth
factors in chapter 62F.
(b) On or before June 30, 2026 the commissioner shall file a report with the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate with the results of the study group’s review and
evaluation along with any recommendations for legislative action regarding Chapter 62F.
of 2